Hawaii statutes.
[§302A-125] Board of education; vacancies.
(a) The governor shall notify the senate in writing within ten days of:

(1) Removing a member of the board; or

(2) Receiving notification that a member of the board
is resigning or has died;

provided that any vacancy shall be filled by
appointment by the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, in
accordance with sections 302A-121, 302A-122, 302A-123, 302A-126, and 302A-127.

(b) Where the chairperson position becomes
vacant, the governor may nominate a sitting member of the board to the
chairperson position in accordance with subsection (a) and shall fill any
resulting vacancy in accordance with subsection (a). [L 2011, c 5, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next